Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2401
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the state has a valid interest in the regulation of the purchase, lease, rental, and transfer of handguns and that requiring a certificate prior to the purchase, lease, rental, or transfer of a handgun serves a valid public purpose.

Laws 1991, LB 355, § 1.